Missouri, session 2026, SB1162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 139.052, 139.053, 140.120, and
140.150, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 139.052, 139.053, 140.120,
and 140.150, to read as follows:
139.052. 1. The governing body of any county [may by
ordinance or order provide] shall allow for the payment of
all or any part of current and delinquent real property
taxes, in such installments and on such terms as the
governing body deems appropriate. [Additionally, the county
legislative body may limit the right to pay such taxes in
installments to certain classes of taxpayers, as may be
prescribed by ordinance or order.] Any delinquent taxes
shall bear interest at the rate provided by section 140.100
and shall be subject to the fees provided by law.
2. The county official charged with the duties of the
collector shall issue receipts for any installment payments.
3. Installment payments made at any time during a tax
year shall not affect the taxpayer's right to protest the
amount of such tax payments under applicable provisions of
law.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1162 2
4. Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
payment for real property taxes by financial institutions,
as defined in section 381.410, who pay tax obligations which
they service from escrow accounts, as defined in Title 24,
Part 3500, Section 17, Code of Federal Regulation, as
amended.
139.053. 1. The governing body of any county,
excluding township counties, [may by ordinance or order
provide] shall allow for the payment of all or any part of
current real and personal property taxes which are owed, at
the option of the taxpayer, on an annual, semiannual or
quarterly basis at such times as determined by such
governing body.
2. The [ordinance] governing body shall provide the
method by which the amount of property taxes owed for the
current tax year in which the payments are to be made shall
be estimated. The collector shall submit to the governing
body the procedures by which taxes will be collected
[pursuant to the ordinance or order]. The estimate shall be
based on the previous tax year's liability. A taxpayer's
payment schedule shall be based on the estimate divided by
the number of pay periods in which payments are to be made.
The taxpayer shall at the end of the tax year pay any
amounts owed in excess of the estimate for such year. The
county shall at the end of the tax year refund to the
taxpayer any amounts paid in excess of the property tax owed
for such year. No interest shall be paid by the county on
excess amounts owed to the taxpayer. Any refund paid the
taxpayer pursuant to this subsection shall be an amount paid
by the county only once in a calendar year.
3. If a taxpayer fails to make an installment payment
of a portion of the real or personal property taxes owed to

SB 1162 3
the county, then such county may charge the taxpayer
interest on the amount of property taxes still owed for that
year.
4. [Any] The governing body [enacting the ordinance or
order specified in this section] shall [first] agree to
provide the county collector with reasonable and necessary
funds to implement the [ordinance or order] provisions of
this section.
5. Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
payment for real property taxes by financial institutions,
as defined in section 381.410, who pay tax obligations which
they service from escrow accounts, as defined in Title 24,
Part 3500, Section 17, Code of Federal Regulation, as
amended.
140.120. 1. If it appears to any county commission,
that any tract of land or town lot contained in the back tax
book is not worth the amount of taxes, interest and cost due
thereon, as charged in the back tax book or that the same
would not sell for the amount of the taxes, interest and
cost, the commission may compromise the taxes with the owner
of the tract or lot. Upon payment to the collector of the
amount agreed upon, a certificate of redemption shall be
issued under the seal of the commission, which shall release
the lands from the lien of the state and all taxes due
thereon, as charged on the back tax book. If the commission
compromises and accepts a less amount than appears to be due
on any tract of land or town lot, as charged on said back
tax book, the commission shall order the amount so paid to
be distributed to the various funds to which the taxes are
due, in proportion as the amount received bears to the whole
amount charged against the tract or lot.

SB 1162 4
2. Prior to commencing the sale of any property to
satisfy delinquent taxes, interest, and penalties, the
collector shall, by registered mail, notify the property
owner of such property that the property owner may negotiate
a compromise on any delinquent taxes, interest, and
penalties. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, any such compromise shall not include a reduction
in the amount of property tax owed, but may include an
agreement to pay such amount in installments as provided in
section 139.052 or 139.053, and may include, at the
collector's discretion, a waiver of all or part of interest
and penalties owned. If no such agreement is in place by
April first, the collector may proceed to sell the property
pursuant to this chapter.
140.150. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of
this section, all lands, lots, mineral rights, and royalty
interests on which taxes or special assessments are
delinquent and unpaid are subject to sale to discharge the
lien for the delinquent and unpaid taxes or unpaid special
assessments as provided for in this chapter on the fourth
Monday in August of each year.
2. No real property, lots, mineral rights, or royalty
interests shall be sold for state, county or city taxes or
special assessments without judicial proceedings, unless the
notice of sale contains the names of all record owners
thereof, or the names of all owners appearing on the land
tax book and all other information required by law.
Delinquent taxes or unpaid special assessments, penalty,
interest and costs due thereon may be paid to the county
collector at any time before the property is sold therefor.
The collector shall send notices to the publicly recorded
owner of record before any delinquent and unpaid taxes or

SB 1162 5
unpaid special assessments as specified in this section
subject to sale are published. The first notice shall be by
first class mail. A second notice shall be sent by
certified mail only if the assessed valuation of the
property is greater than one thousand dollars. If the
assessed valuation of the property is not greater than one
thousand dollars, only the first notice shall be required.
If any second notice sent by certified mail under this
section is returned to the collector unsigned, then notice
shall be sent before the sale by first class mail to both
the owner of record and the occupant of the real property.
The postage for the mailing of the notices shall be paid out
of the county treasury, and such costs shall be added to the
costs of conducting the sale, and the county treasury shall
be reimbursed to the extent that such postage costs are
recovered at the sale. The failure of the taxpayer or the
publicly recorded owner to receive the notice provided for
in this section shall not relieve the taxpayer or publicly
recorded owner of any tax liability imposed by law.
3. The entry in the back tax book by the county clerk
of the delinquent lands, lots, mineral rights, and royalty
interests constitutes a levy upon the delinquent lands,
lots, mineral rights, and royalty interests for the purpose
of enforcing the lien of delinquent and unpaid taxes or
unpaid special assessments, together with penalty, interest
and costs.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or
chapter 141 to the contrary, for any property that becomes
delinquent on or after January 1, 2027, a collector shall
not commence the sale of such property to satisfy delinquent
taxes, interest, and penalties for a period of fifteen years
following the date such property becomes delinquent. Upon

SB 1162 6
the expiration of such fifteen year period, if delinquent
taxes, interest, and penalties are still owed on such
property, the collector may commence the sale of such
property as provided in this chapter or chapter 141. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any
delinquent property that is abandoned property. For the
purposes of this subsection, "abandoned property" shall mean
any real property that is delinquent for three or more
consecutive years, and for which the collector is unable to
contact the property owner. The collector may commence the
sale of such abandoned property once it is determined that
such property is abandoned.
✓